Washington statutes.
RCW 1.12.040

Computation of time.

The time within which an act is to be done, as herein provided, shall be computed by excluding the first day, and including the last, unless the last day is a holiday, Saturday, or Sunday, and then it is also excluded.

[ 1997 c 125 s 1; 1887 c 20 s 1; Code 1881 s 743; 1854 p 219 s 486; RRS s 150.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: CR 6(a), RAP 18.6. Cf. RAP 18.22.

Reviser's note: This section has been enacted at various times as part of "An act to regulate the practice and proceedings in civil actions." However, Allen v. Morris, 87 Wash. 268, 274, 151 Pac. 827 (1915); State ex rel. Evans v. Superior Court, 168 Wash. 176, 179, 11 P. (2d) 229 (1932); State v. Levesque, 5 Wn. (2d) 631, 635, 106 P. (2d) 309 (1940); and State ex rel. Early v. Batchelor, 15 Wn. (2d) 149, 130 P. (2d) 72 (1942), treat this section as being of general application.